Montana, session 2025, HB203.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Montana mining day. There is established a mining day for the state of Montana. The
Montana mining day is February 9 of each year to commemorate when the territorial government adopted the
state motto.
Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
1, chapter 1, part 2, and the provisions of Title 1, chapter 1, part 2, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 203
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 203, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 203
INTRODUCED BY C. SCHOMER, S. KLAKKEN, J. SECKINGER, K. LOVE, J. SOOKTIS, C. COCHRAN, E.
TILLEMAN, D. BEDEY, E. BUTTREY, S. GIST, C. HINKLE, R. MARSHALL, N. NICOL, A. REGIER, C.
SPRUNGER, D. HARVEY, S. FITZPATRICK, B. LER, L. DEMING, J. GILLETTE, B. BARKER, L. BREWSTER,
T. FALK, J. FITZPATRICK, T. FRANCE, D. LENZ, T. MCGILLVRAY, B. MERCER, B. MITCHELL, G.
NIKOLAKAKOS, K. SEEKINS-CROWE, S. MANESS, J. HINKLE, C. FITZPATRICK
AN ACT PROVIDING FOR MONTANA MINING DAY.”